Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.015

Interstate oil compact commission—Governor may join.

The governor is authorized, on behalf of the state of Washington, to join the interstate oil compact commission as an associate member and to become an active member thereof if and when oil and gas are produced in Washington in commercial quantities and to attend meetings and participate in the activities carried on by said commission either in person or by a duly authorized representative.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.06.015. Prior: 1953 c 47 s 1.]

NOTES:

Interstate compact to conserve oil and gas: 65 Stat. 199 (P. L. 128, ch. 350) Aug. 28, 1951. Associate membership authorized by Art. 9 s 2 of the commission's bylaws.